Louisiana, session 2026, HB289.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 873 is hereby amended and reenacted
7 to read as follows:
8 Art. 873. Delay between conviction and sentence
9 If a defendant is convicted of a felony, at least three days shall elapse
10 between conviction and sentence sentencing. If a motion for a new trial, or in arrest
11 of judgment, is filed, sentence shall not be imposed until at least twenty-four hours
12 after the motion is overruled. If the defendant expressly waives a delay provided for
13 in this article Article or pleads guilty, sentence may be imposed immediately.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.